Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
PART 5 Certain Law Enforcement Personnel

47-2-220.
Membership in retirement system of employees of the Department of Corrections; contributions; creditable service; eligibility for survivors benefits.

On and after March 7, 1961, the eligible employees of the Department of Corrections are authorized to become members of Division A within the retirement system.

The Department of Corrections or such official therein who is responsible for the payment of compensation to the employees within that department shall cause to be deducted from the compensation of each member for each and every payroll period the employee contributions as may be required under this chapter and shall pay to the board of trustees, in such manner as the board of trustees may prescribe, the amounts so deducted. The commissioner of corrections is authorized and directed to pay such employer contributions as may be required under this chapter. Such employer contributions shall be paid to the board of trustees, as prescribed by it, from funds appropriated for the operation of the Department of Corrections.

In addition to the regular employer contributions required under this chapter, the commissioner of corrections is authorized and directed to pay, from funds received by the Department of Corrections as compensation for the various services rendered by it, an additional contribution as determined by the board of trustees. The additional contribution shall be a regular quarterly amount sufficient to amortize within 15 years the total amount of the employer contributions which would have been paid for all of that department’s employees from August 1, 1953, to July 1, 1961, and shall include interest on these employer contributions at a rate prescribed by the board of trustees. These quarterly payments shall begin on July 1, 1961. In the event the earnings of the department are not sufficient to pay such contributions, the contributions shall be paid from funds available to the department from appropriations, or otherwise. If the contributions are not made as provided in this Code section, this Code section shall be null and void.

Any individual who is an employee of the Department of Corrections on March 7, 1961, may become a member of Division A of the retirement system; but he shall not be considered as eligible for any service credits whatsoever other than membership service for which he contributes.

Any individual who on August 1, 1953, was an employee of the Department of Corrections and without a break in service with that department so remained in the employment of that department on March 7, 1961, and who has not previously declined membership in the retirement system shall, upon becoming a member of the retirement system and upon immediate payment by the member of the total amount of accumulated contributions which would have accrued had he been a contributing member since August 1, 1953, be entitled to all creditable service in the same manner as other individuals in that department who became members of Division A of the retirement system.

Any eligible employee of the Department of Corrections who became a member of the retirement system under subsection (d) of this Code section and who did not immediately pay the full amount of those accumulated contributions may pay the amount of his accumulated contributions over a ten-year period by means of monthly payments. No individual shall be credited with the full amount of his prior service or membership service credits until such time as he has made the total contributions required of him. The board of trustees may promulgate rules and regulations to implement this Code section, including a prescription of the actuarial value which shall be credited to the member’s account for each monthly payment made as herein provided if he should retire, die, or become disabled before having paid the full amount of the accumulated contributions required of him under subsection (e) of this Code section. The board of trustees may establish a date for the commencement for such payments, which date shall be no earlier than July 1, 1962.

Anything in this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, employees of the Department of Corrections who become members of the retirement system shall be eligible for survivors benefits in accordance with the rules and regulations relative to the same which were in existence on July 1, 1953, provided that any determination relative to the member’s eligibility for such benefits shall also be based upon the age of the member on the date he elects membership, notwithstanding the fact that he may have been an employee of the department on January 1, 1953.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 112, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 146, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1.

47-2-221.
Disability allowances payable to personnel for certain disabilities arising in the line of duty.

Notwithstanding the disability allowance provided for in Code Section 47-2-123, any member in service of the Uniform Division of the Department of Public Safety, any game warden of the Department of Natural Resources, any officer or agent of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation, and any alcohol and tobacco officer or agent of the Department of Revenue who, while a contributing member of this retirement system and upon becoming permanently disabled due to an act of external violence or injury incurred in line of duty, becomes eligible for disability retirement allowances shall, upon making written application to the board of trustees either personally or through his or her employer and after a medical examination and upon certification by the medical board that such member is, in their opinion, permanently disabled, be entitled to a monthly allowance as computed on the member’s life expectancy without option. Such monthly allowance as shall be payable to the member only, during his or her life or length of disability, shall not exceed 80 percent of the service allowance that would have been payable to the member had he accumulated not more than 30 years of creditable service and had retired at age 65. Such allowance shall be computed on the basis of the member’s monthly earnable compensation for the month in which his or her permanent disability occurred. Such permanent disability retirement shall apply regardless of the length of service of any such member; and such member shall be deemed to have acquired 30 or more years of creditable service. In addition, a member so disabled in the line of duty shall receive a monthly supplemental benefit which shall be in the amount of $5.00 per month for each year of creditable service as a member of the Uniform Division of the Department of Public Safety, game warden of the Department of Natural Resources, alcohol and tobacco officer or agent of the Department of Revenue, or as an officer or agent of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation. Such additional monthly supplemental benefit shall in no event exceed $150.00 per month. Any other provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, any member of the Uniform Division of the Department of Public Safety who retired prior to July 1, 1970, as a result of becoming permanently disabled due to an act of external violence or injury incurred in the line of duty and who was a member of the retirement system on the date of the injury or act of violence shall be entitled to and shall receive the monthly supplemental benefit provided for in this subsection.

In lieu of the foregoing, any member so disabled in the line of duty shall be entitled to receive a minimum monthly disability retirement benefit equal to 2 percent of his or her monthly earnable compensation for the month in which his or her permanent disability occurred for each year of creditable service determined as though he or she had continued in service in the Uniform Division of the Department of Public Safety, as a game warden of the Department of Natural Resources, as an alcohol and tobacco officer or agent of the Department of Revenue, or as an officer or agent of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation until his or her mandatory retirement age.

Notwithstanding the disability allowance provided for in Code Section 47-2-123, any employee of the Department of Natural Resources appointed as a deputy game warden under Code Section 27-1-17, any parole officer employed by the State Board of Pardons and Paroles, any probation officer employed by the Department of Corrections, and any community supervision officer employed by the Department of Community Supervision who, while a contributing member of this retirement system and upon becoming permanently disabled due to an act of external violence or injury incurred in the line of law enforcement duty, becomes eligible for disability retirement allowances shall, after a medical examination and upon certification by the medical board that such member is, in their opinion, permanently disabled, be entitled to a monthly allowance as computed on the member’s life expectancy without option. Such monthly allowance as shall be payable to the member only, during his or her life or length of disability, shall not exceed 80 percent of the service allowance that would have been payable to the member had he or she accumulated not more than 30 years of creditable service and had retired at age 65. Such allowance shall be computed on the basis of the member’s monthly earnable compensation for the month in which his or her permanent disability occurred. Such permanent disability retirement shall apply regardless of the length of service of any such member; and such member shall be deemed to have acquired 30 or more years of creditable service. In addition, a member so disabled in the line of law enforcement duty shall receive a monthly supplemental benefit which shall be in the amount of $5.00 per month for each year of creditable service as an employee of the Department of Natural Resources who has been appointed as a deputy game warden under Code Section 27-1-17, parole officer of the State Board of Pardons and Paroles, probation officer of the Department of Corrections, or any community supervision officer employed by the Department of Community Supervision. Such additional monthly supplemental benefit shall in no event exceed $150.00 per month.

In lieu of the foregoing, any member so disabled in the line of law enforcement duty shall be entitled to receive a minimum monthly disability retirement benefit equal to 2 percent of his or her monthly earnable compensation for the month in which his or her permanent disability occurred for each year of creditable service determined as though he or she had continued in service as a deputy game warden, probation officer, parole officer, or a community supervision officer until his or her mandatory retirement age.

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 152, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1361, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 26, § 2; Ga. L. 1971, p. 685, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1499, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1407, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1096, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1998, p. 230, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 555, § 2/HB 459; Ga. L. 2016, p. 285, § 1/HB 421; Ga. L. 2019, p. 808, § 7/SB 72.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, in paragraph (b)(1), near the middle of the first sentence, substituted “any probation officer employed by the Department of Corrections, and any community supervision officer employed by the Department of Community Supervision” for “and any probation officer employed by the Department of Corrections”, and, in the next to last sentence, substituted “probation officer of the Department of Corrections, or any community supervision officer employed by the Department of Community Supervision” for “or probation officer of the Department of Corrections”; and, near the end of paragraph (b)(2), substituted “parole officer, or a community supervision officer” for “or parole officer”.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “game warden” for “conservation ranger” throughout this Code section.

47-2-222.
Power to increase liability contribution rates for certain departments or agencies; transfer of employees.

Any other provisions of law to the contrary notwithstanding, the board of trustees may increase the normal and accrued liability employer contribution rates of the Department of Public Safety, the Department of Natural Resources, the Department of Revenue, the Georgia Bureau of Investigation, the Department of Corrections, the State Board of Pardons and Paroles, and any other agency or authority to an amount set by the board of trustees as actuarially sufficient to fund the employer’s cost of the benefits provided in this chapter for groups of employees of such departments or agencies. In the event any group of employees of any of such departments or agencies is transferred to the administration of any other department or agency, that department or agency shall continue to pay the normal and accrued liability contributions on behalf of such employees at the rate set by the board of trustees.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 900, § 10; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1210, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 358, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 322, § 3/HB 476; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 64/SB 436.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in the first sentence, deleted “and” following “Resources,” and inserted “, the Georgia Bureau of Investigation, the Department of Corrections, the State Board of Pardons and Paroles, and any other agency or authority” in the middle.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “such departments or agencies” for “such departments” twice.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 67, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “In the event of an irreconcilable conflict between a provision of Sections 62 through 64 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2010 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over this Act to the extent of the conflict.”

47-2-223.
Retirement benefits for those in service in Uniform Division of the Department of Public Safety.

For purposes of this Code section, the term “highest average compensation” means the member’s highest average monthly earnable compensation during a period of 24 consecutive calendar months while a member of the retirement system.

Anything in this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, every person who is in service in the Uniform Division of the Department of Public Safety as an officer, noncommissioned officer, or trooper, or as an officer or agent of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation on June 30, 1970, and every person who enters or reenters such service on or after July 1, 1970, may retire at any time after attaining the age of 55 and upon retirement such retiree shall receive the regular retirement benefits under this chapter, provided that he or she shall in any case receive a minimum monthly retirement benefit equal to 2 percent of his or her highest average compensation for each year of creditable service by filing an application therefor in a manner similar to that provided in Code Section 47-2-110.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 15; Ga. L. 1970, p. 26, § 3; Ga. L. 1971, p. 685, § 2; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1440, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 555, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1104, § 2.

47-2-224.
[Reserved] Mandatory retirement age and monthly retirement benefits for certain members of the Department of Natural Resources and of the Department of Revenue; waiver of mandatory retirement age.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 28, effective July 1, 2010.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1974, p. 1210, § 2; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1407, § 2; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1459, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1463, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-2-225.
Creditable service for members with prior service as narcotics agents; membership in retirement system of members who were employed as narcotics agents.

Any other provision of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, any member who was employed as a narcotics agent pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 35-3-9 prior to becoming a member of the retirement system shall be entitled to obtain creditable service for all such prior service subject to the conditions contained in this Code section. In order to be eligible for such creditable service, the member must make application as prescribed by the board not later than July 1, 1997, or one year after becoming a member of the retirement system, whichever date is later, provide proof of such prior service, and pay the employee contributions which he or she would have paid if he or she had been a member of the retirement system, together with regular interest thereon. Within 30 days after the retirement system gives notice that the foregoing conditions have been met, the Georgia Bureau of Investigation shall pay the employer contributions which would have been paid for the member if he or she had been a member of the retirement system, together with regular interest thereon.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-225

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 722, § 1.

47-2-226.
Certain law enforcement officers permitted to obtain creditable service in retirement system under certain conditions; “law enforcement officer” defined; payment of full actuarial value to applicant.

As used in this Code section, the term “law enforcement officer” means any member in service of the Uniform Division of the Department of Public Safety, any game warden of the Department of Natural Resources, any officer or agent of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation, any district attorney investigator who is compensated from state funds pursuant to Code Section 15-18-14.1, any alcohol and tobacco officer or agent of the Department of Revenue, any investigator of the Department of Driver Services, and any criminal investigators or K9 handlers of the Department of Corrections.

Any law enforcement officer who, prior to becoming a member of this retirement system, was employed by a local government in this state as a full-time employee, in a position in which he or she was vested with authority to enforce the criminal or traffic laws and with the power of arrest and whose duties include the preservation of public order, the protection of life and property, or the prevention, detection, or investigation of crime, shall be eligible to obtain creditable service under this Code section for his or her years of service in such capacity if:

The member is not eligible to receive a present or future benefit from a defined benefit or defined contribution retirement or pension plan in which said member participated while employed by the local governing authority other than membership in the Peace Officers’ Annuity and Benefit Fund; and

The member has been a member of the retirement system for at least ten years.

Any member eligible as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section may obtain up to an additional five years of creditable service, not to exceed the actual number of years of service described in subsection (b) of this Code section. In order to obtain such additional creditable service, the member shall:

Make application to the board of trustees in such manner and provide such documentation as the board deems appropriate; and

Pay to the board of trustees an amount determined by the board of trustees to be sufficient to cover the full actuarial cost of granting the creditable service as provided in this Code section.

Upon receipt of an application for additional creditable service, the board of trustees shall certify to the applicant the amount of the payment required by paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-226

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 365, § 1/HB 690; Ga. L. 2018, p. 150, § 1/HB 135; Ga. L. 2019, p. 808, § 7/SB 72.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2016.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in subsection (a), deleted “and” following “Code Section 15-18-14.1,” in the middle, and added “, any investigator of the Department of Driver Services, and any criminal investigators or K9 handlers of the Department of Corrections” at the end; in subsection (b), inserted “in this state” near the middle, and inserted “for his or her years of service in such capacity” near the end; and, in paragraph (b)(1), substituted “is not eligible to receive a present or future benefit from” for “was not eligible for” near the beginning, and inserted “in which said member participated” in the middle.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “game warden” for “conservation ranger” in the middle of subsection (a).